Louisiana, session 2026, SB73.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Section 4 of Act No. 774 of the 2024 Regular Session of the Legislature
of Louisiana is hereby repealed in its entirety.
Section 2. Section 5 of Act No. 411 of the 2025 Regular Session of the Legislature
of Louisiana is hereby repealed in its entirety.
Section 3. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.